new_hnd_mo/without_Z_apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="/yaha__p">
<e><p><l>yaha</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yaha</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakA</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakA</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inakI</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isa</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isa</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isane</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isane</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ise</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ise</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isako</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isako</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isase</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isase</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_liye</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_liye</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_xvArA</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isake_xvArA</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isameM</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isameM</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isapara</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isapara</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ina</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ina</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inheM</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inheM</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inako</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inako</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inase</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inase</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>inake_liye</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake_liye</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake_xvArA</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inake_xvArA</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>inameM</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inameM</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inapara</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inapara</l><r>yaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="yaha"><i></i><par n="/yaha__p"/></e>
